Vermont, session 2025-2026, H742.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. chapter 163 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 163. PUBLIC DEFENDERS
* * *
Subchapter 5. Legal Representation in Immigration Proceedings
§ 5281. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly to require the State of Vermont to
establish a program to provide legal assistance for persons detained in Vermont
in connection with federal immigration proceedings. The program established
VT LEG #386429 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.742
2026 Page 2 of 9
pursuant to this subchapter shall be consistent with the following principles
and standards:
(1) The State is committed to fair and equal treatment of all individuals,
and, in particular, of individuals at risk of removal and separation from their
families through the federal immigration detention and deportation system.
(2) While an individual in removal proceedings has the right to legal
representation, the representation is at the individual’s own expense and may
be beyond the financial capacity of low-income households.
(3) Nearly two-thirds of all individuals facing immigration removal
proceedings throughout the United States lack legal representation. Among the
individuals in immigration detention, only one in six individuals were
represented by counsel.
(4) Legal representation is essential to effective identification and
presentation of avenues for release from detention and relief from removal.
Individuals in immigration detention are four times more likely to win release
if represented by legal counsel than individuals without representation by legal
counsel. In removal proceedings, detained individuals are 11 times more likely
to succeed in claims for relief if represented by legal counsel than individuals
without representation by legal counsel.
VT LEG #386429 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.742
2026 Page 3 of 9
(5) Although immigration detention and proceedings are civil in nature,
immigrants are subjected to adversarial legal proceedings and are often
detained throughout their legal cases.
(6) Many people in immigration court proceedings have valid legal
claims to remain in the United States but are unable to argue their cases
effectively absent legal expertise in complex U.S. immigration law.
(7) Deportations and immigration detentions are costly to Vermont
taxpayers, who must cover the cost of detention; costly to employers
experiencing labor shortages; and costly to communities who are called on to
provide support when individuals are not allowed to work and remain with
their families as they contest their immigration cases.
(8) Legal representation in removal proceedings has improved the
efficiency of the proceedings and the administration of justice as individuals
are better able to present their defenses and claims for relief.
(9) It is the public policy of this State that all covered individuals subject
to federal immigration proceedings should have the right to ongoing legal
representation. This right to counsel should include provisions of funds
sufficient to ensure that legal service providers are funded to:
(A) engage support staff, interpretation staff, and investigative staff;
(B) contract as reasonably necessary with independent experts,
including country conditions experts and forensic medical experts; and
VT LEG #386429 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.742
2026 Page 4 of 9
(C) contract as reasonably necessary with social service providers
providing supportive and rehabilitative services to covered individuals during
the course of their removal proceedings.
(10) This State should establish a program and a dedicated fund to
provide the legal services described in this section.
§ 5282. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Covered individual” means a person who, regardless of age, is:
(A) subject to removal proceedings under:
(i) 8 U.S.C. §§ 1225, 1228, and 1229a; or
(ii) a final order of removal under 8 C.F.R. § 1241.1, including
any related covered proceeding; and
(B)(i) a domiciliary of this State; or
(ii) if not a domiciliary of this State, is in detention or incarcerated
in this State for purposes of immigration enforcement or is subject to a removal
proceeding.
(2) “Program” means the Legal Representation in Federal Immigration
Proceedings Program created in section 5283 of this title.
§ 5283. LEGAL REPRESENTATION IN FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
PROCEEDINGS PROGRAM; DIRECTOR; STAFF ATTORNEYS
VT LEG #386429 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.742
2026 Page 5 of 9
(a) The Legal Representation in Federal Immigration Proceedings Program
is created within the Office of Defender General. The Program shall provide
legal representation to covered individuals in federal immigration proceedings
as required by this subchapter.
(b) There is created the position of Director of the Legal Representation in
Federal Immigration Proceedings Program. The Director shall:
(1) supervise and manage the Legal Representation in Federal
Immigration Proceedings Program;
(2) provide legal representation to covered individuals pursuant to this
subchapter;
(3) contract, if and to the extent deemed necessary by the Director, with
the Vermont Asylum Assistance Project to provide the legal representation
required by this subchapter; and
(4) coordinate with the Office of the Defender General and the Vermont
Asylum Assistance Project as necessary to implement the intent of this
subchapter.
(c) Two staff attorney positions are created within the Legal Representation
in Federal Immigration Proceedings Program to provide legal representation to
covered individuals as determined by the Director.
VT LEG #386429 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.742
2026 Page 6 of 9
§ 5284. RIGHT TO REPRESENTATION, SERVICES, AND FACILITIES
(a) A covered individual who is being detained for an alleged violation of
federal immigration law is entitled:
(1) to be represented by an attorney to the same extent as a person
having the person’s own counsel, including for purposes of any appeal; and
(2) to be provided with the necessary services and facilities of
representation.
(b) Legal representation under this subchapter shall begin not later than the
time of the covered individual’s intake as part of the detention facility’s intake
process.
(c) The attorney, services and facilities, and court costs shall be provided at
public expense to the extent that the covered individual is unable to provide
payment without undue hardship.
§ 5285. LEGAL REPRESENTATION IN FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
PROCEEDINGS ADVISORY COUNCIL
(a) Creation. The Legal Representation in Federal Immigration
Proceedings Advisory Council is established within the Office of Defender
General to serve in an advisory capacity to the Legal Representation in Federal
Immigration Proceedings Program. The Council shall be organized and have
the duties and responsibilities as provided in this section.
(b) Membership.
VT LEG #386429 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.742
2026 Page 7 of 9
(1) Appointments. The Council shall consist of seven members, as
follows:
(A) one member, appointed by the Vermont Asylum Assistance
Project;
(B) one member, appointed by the Defender General;
(C) one member, appointed by Migrant Justice;
(D) one member, appointed by the American Civil Liberties Union of
Vermont;
(E) one member, appointed by the Vermont Immigration Legal
Defense Fund;
(F) one member, appointed by the Commissioner of Corrections; and
(G) one member with lived experience as an immigration
proceedings detainee, appointed by the Vermont Asylum Assistance Project.
(2) Qualifications. Members shall be drawn from diverse backgrounds
throughout the State and, to the extent possible, have experience working in
matters related to immigration.
(3) Terms. The term of each member shall be four years. As terms of
currently serving members expire, appointments of successors shall be in
accord with the provisions of this section. Appointments of members to fill
vacancies or expired terms shall be made by the authority that made the initial
appointment to the vacated or expired term. Members shall serve until their
VT LEG #386429 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.742
2026 Page 8 of 9
successors are appointed. Members shall serve not more than two consecutive
terms in any capacity.
(4) Chair and terms. Members of the Council shall elect by majority
vote the Chair of the Council.
(c) Duties. The Council shall have the following duties and
responsibilities:
(1) work with and assist the Director to implement the requirements of
this subchapter;
(2) advise and make recommendations to the Director to ensure ongoing
compliance with the purpose of this subchapter; and
(3) on or before January 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, report to the
House and Senate Committees on Judiciary on a status report on activities
conducted and progress made by the Legal Representation in Federal
Immigration Proceedings Program and recommendations for further action,
including legislative proposals, to address the need for legal representation in
immigration proceedings.
(d) Compensation. Each member of the Council shall be entitled to per
diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 32 V.S.A.
§ 1010.
VT LEG #386429 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.742
2026 Page 9 of 9
Sec. 2. LEGAL REPRESENTATION IN FEDERAL IMMIGRATION
PROCEEDINGS PROGRAM; POSITIONS CREATED;
APPROPRIATION
(a) One full-time, classified permanent Director of the Legal
Representation in Federal Immigration Proceedings Program position and two
full-time staff attorney positions are created in the Office of Defender General
for purposes of implementing the Legal Representation in Federal Immigration
Proceedings Program created in 13 V.S.A. § 5283.
(b) There is appropriated to the Office of Defender General from the
General Fund in fiscal year 2027 the sum of $1,000,000.00 for the Legal
Representation in Federal Immigration Proceedings Program in the Office of
Defender General.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386429 v.1